District of Columbia statutes.
50-211.05

Acquisition authority.

(a)

Other than the Director and the entities exempt under § 50-211.02(b), (c), and (d)(1), no District entity, subdivision, or agency shall execute an agreement to purchase, lease, or otherwise acquire a vehicle for District government use; provided, that the Director may delegate the authority to acquire a specialized vehicle, emergency vehicle, heavy equipment, or non-passenger vehicle to another subordinate agency.

(b)

Passenger vehicles acquired by the District shall be compact vehicles or smaller, except where the Director provides a written finding that these vehicles cannot meet the specific mission needs.

(c)

[Not funded].

Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-223, § 105, 59 DCR 13537
This section is referenced in § 50-211.02.

Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-223 provided that §§ 103, 105(c), and 201(d) of the act shall apply upon the inclusion of their fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.

Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-223 provided that §§ 101, 102, 104, 105(a), 105(b), 106, 107, 201(a), 201(b), 201(c), 202, 203, and 301 of the act shall apply as of Mar. 5, 2013.